New York, session 2025-2026, A4058.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 3 of section 134-a of the social services law, 2 as amended by chapter 144 of the laws of 2021, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 3. The social services official shall require that persons applying 5 for or receiving public assistance and care be interviewed personally at 6 a time and in a manner provided by the regulations of the department, 7 and the social services official may provide the option of a phone 8 interview or other digital means for such interview at the request of 9 the applicant or recipient. In the event a person applying for or 10 receiving public assistance and care who is required to be interviewed 11 by a social services official does not participate in three consecutive 12 scheduled interviews, the social services official may deny, suspend or 13 discontinue public assistance or care until such time as the person 14 applying for or receiving public assistance and care participates in an 15 interview. 16 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06283-01-5